apertium-fin-udm.udm.lexc
LEXICON Glagoly


!кыpӟаны:кыpӟа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "петь"
адӟыны:адӟ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "видеть"
быгатыны:быгат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "мочь"
бызьыны:бызь GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "бегать"
вамышъяны:вамышъ GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "шагать"
вань: GLAGOL-VAN ; 
ватскыны:ватск GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "спрятаться"
вераны:вер GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "говорить"
вераськыны:вераськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разговаривать"
вуыны:ву GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "прибыть"
дугдыны:дугд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "остановиться"
изьыны:изь GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "спать" 
карыны:кар GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "делать"
кельшыны:кельш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "нравиться"
кылзӥськыны:кылзӥськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "вслушиваться"
кылыны:кыл GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "услышать"
кылӥськыны:кылӥськ GLAGOL-1-IV ; ! "слышаться"
луыны:лу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "быть"
лыдъяськыны:лыдъяськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "считать"
лыктыны:лыкт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "приходить"
малпаны:малпа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "думать"
мыняны:мыня GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "улыбаться"
пукыны:пук GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сидеть"
пырыны:пыр GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "заходить"
пытсаны:пытса GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "закрыть"
серекъяны:серекъя GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "смеяться"
сиыны:си GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "есть"
тодыны:тод GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "знать"
тыршыны:тырш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "стараться"
уг: GLAGOL-UG ;
улыны:ул GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "жить"
утчаны:утч GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "искать"
утчаськыны:утчаськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разыскивать"
учкыны:учк GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "смотреть"
шедьтыны:шедьт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "найти"
шудыны:шуд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "играть"
шуыны:шу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сказать"
юаны:юа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "спросить"
юыны:ю GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "пить"
яратыны:ярат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "любить"



LEXICON Prilagatelnoe

чебер A1 ; ! "красивый"
шуныт A1 ; ! "тёплый"
кезьыт A1 ; ! "холодный"
пичи A1 ; ! "маленький"
бадӟым A1 ; ! "большой"
вуж A1 ; ! ""
матэ A1 ; ! ""
умой A1 ; ! "хороший"



LEXICON Nouns

пуны N1 ; ! "собака"
сад N1 ; ! "сад"
куазь N1 ; ! "погода"
урам N1 ; ! "улица"
корка N1-KORKA ; ! "дом"
пияш N1 ; ! "мальчик"
нылаш N1 ; ! "девочка"
пинал N1 ; ! "ребёнок"
коӵыш N1 ; ! "кошка"
анай N1 ; ! "мама"
укно N1 ; ! "окно"
писпу N1 ; ! "дерево"
син N1 ; ! "глаз"
ки N1 ; ! "рука"
шудон N1 ; ! "игра"
юан N1 ; ! "вопрос"
валэктон N1 ; ! "ответ"
ӝӧк N1 ; ! "стол"
пукон N1 ; ! "стул"
куара N1 ; ! "звук"
тылобурдо N1 ; ! "птица"
пӧйшур N1 ; ! "животное"
йыр N1 ; ! "голова"
ву N1 ; ! "вода"
нылпи N1 ; ! ""
адями N1 ; ! ""
йыр N1 ; ! ""
ар N1 ; ! ""
сузэр N1 ; ! ""


LEXICON Punktuacija

.%<sent%>:. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
!%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
